src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2018 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! # Kildin Saami verbs


LEXICON Verb   !!= * **@CODE@**
Aux	; ! auxilary
Cop	; ! copula
NegAux ; ! negative auxilary
NegCop ; ! negative copula
ImpMod ;
Verbstems ;

LEXICON Aux
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Sg3:лӣ K ;

LEXICON Cop
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Inf:лӣйе K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ля̄ K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ля̄к K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Sg3:лӣ K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ле̄бпь K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ле̄бпе K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ле̄в K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prt+Sg1:лӣйе K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prt+Sg2:лӣйекь K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ля̄йй K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prt+Pl1:лӣйемь K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prt+Pl2:лӣйетҍ K ;
+V+Cop+Ind+Prt+Pl3:лӣйенҍ K ;
+V+Cop+Fut+Sg3:ля̄ннч K ;

LEXICON NegAux   !!= * **@CODE@**
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Sg1:эмм K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Sg1+Use/Orth:ымм K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Sg2:эгк K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Sg3:эйй K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Pl1:ебпь K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Pl2:ебпе K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Pl3:ев K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Impers:едтҍ K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Sg:ель K ;
+V+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Pl:елле K ;

LEXICON NegCop
+V+Cop+Pos+Prs:бэдт K ;
+V+Cop+Pos+Prs+Use/Orth:быдт K ;
+V+Cop+Pos+??:бэдтӭ K ; 
+V+Cop+Pos+??+Use/Orth:быдтӭ K ;
+V+Cop+Pos+Cond:бэдаһч K ;
+V+Cop+Neg+Prs:ибе K ;
+V+Cop+Neg+??:ебэдтӭ K ;
+V+Cop+Neg+Cond:ебэдтче K ;

LEXICON ImpMod
+V+Imp+Neg+Prs+Sg3:элля K ;
+V+Imp+Neg+Prs+Sg3+Use/Dial:элляк K ;
+V+Imp+Neg+Prs+Pl3:еввла K ;
+V+Imp+Neg+Prs+Pl3+Use/Dial:еввлак K ;
+V+Imp+Neg+Prt+Sg3:эллий K ;
+V+Imp+Neg+Prt+Pl3:еввлий K ;


! the simplest verb class (without any paradigmatic stem alternations)
! comprises most verbs from Kurutch's classes II, III, and IV
! in MR's analysis, this is "class II" (out of three classes)
! [not important here, but these are derived verbs with three-syllabic stems historically; the vocalism of the second syllable is syncopated; that's why the consonantism looks odd (-бш- -рьйх- …) and doesn't undergo stem gradation]

! (phonologically) the rules are the following:
! 1. replace the infinitive suffix /-e/ with the respective inflectional suffix, except in:
! --> +V+Prs+Sg3
! --> +V+Prt+Sg3
! --> +V+Imprt+Sg
! 2. replace the infinitive suffix /-e/ with the suffix /-t/ in:
! --> +V+Prs+Sg3
! --> +V+Prt+Sg3
! --> +V+Imprt+Sg
! 3. insert the infix /-a-/ before the last consonant in:
! --> +V+Prs+Sg3
! 4. insert the infix /-e-/ before the last consonant in:
! --> +V+Prt+Sg3
! --> +V+Imprt+Sg
! unfortunately, these rules become much more complicated in the cyrillic orthography…

!шоабшэ:шоабаш:шоабэш 1_EPH "любить / love" ;

! Indicative non-past
+V+Prs+Sg1:шоабша K ;
+V+Prs+Sg2:шоабшак K ;
+V+Prs+Sg3:шоабашт K ;
+V+Prs+Pl1:шоабшэпь K ;
+V+Prs+Pl2:шоабшэбпе K ;
+V+Prs+Pl3:шоабшэв K ;

+V+Impers+Prs:шоабшэтҍ K ; ! I don't know how to gloss "impersonal" [MR]

! Indicative past
+V+Prt+Sg1:шоабшэ K ;
+V+Prt+Sg2:шоабшэк K ;
+V+Prt+Sg3:шоабэшт K ;
+V+Prt+Pl1:шоабшэмь K ;
+V+Prt+Pl2:шоабшэтҍ K ;
+V+Prt+Pl3:шоабшэнҍ K ;

+V+Impers+Prt:шоабшэнҍ K ;

! Imperative singular
+V+Imprt+Sg:шоабэшт K ; ! formally similar to 3sg.pst

! Imperative plural
+V+Imprt+Sg:шоабшэгкэ K ;

! Connegative non-past ! I don't know how to gloss "connegative" [MR]
+V+ConNeg+Prs:шоабэшт K ; ! formally similar to 3sg.pst

! Connegative past
+V+ConNeg+Prt:шоабшма K ; ! formally similar to perfect perticiple

!кырьйхэ:кырьяһ:кырьеһ "писать / write" ; !kyr'jhe:kyr'jah:kyr'jeh

! Indicative non-past
+V+Prs+Sg1:кырьйха K ;
+V+Prs+Sg2:кырьйхак K ;
+V+Prs+Sg3:кырьяһт K ;
+V+Prs+Pl1:кырьйхэпь K ;
+V+Prs+Pl2:кырьйхэбпе K ;
+V+Prs+Pl3:кырьйхэв K ;

+V+Impers+Prs:кырьйхэтҍ K ; ! I don't know how to gloss "impersonal" [MR]

! Indicative past
+V+Prt+Sg1:кырьйхэ K ;
+V+Prt+Sg2:кырьйхэк K ;
+V+Prt+Sg3:кырьеһт K ;
+V+Prt+Pl1:кырьйхэмь K ;
+V+Prt+Pl2:кырьйхэтҍ K ;
+V+Prt+Pl3:кырьйхэнҍ K ;

+V+Impers+Prt:кырьйхэнҍ K ;

! Imperative singular
+V+Imprt+Sg:кырьеһт K ; ! formally similar to 3sg.pst

! Imperative plural
+V+Imprt+Sg:кырьйхэгкэ K ;

! Connegative non-past ! I don't know how to gloss "connegative" [MR]
+V+ConNeg+Prs:кырьеһт K ; ! formally similar to 3sg.pst

! Connegative past
+V+ConNeg+Prt:кырьйхма K ; ! formally similar to perfect perticiple

!вāннҍцлэ:вāннҍцалт:вāннҍцэлт "пойти / go (a little bit) / vázzilit" ;

! Indicative non-past
+V+Prs+Sg1:вāннҍцла K ;
+V+Prs+Sg2:вāннҍцлак K ;
+V+Prs+Sg3:вāннҍцалт K ;
+V+Prs+Pl1:вāннҍцлэпь K ;
+V+Prs+Pl2:вāннҍцлэбпе K ;
+V+Prs+Pl3:вāннҍцлэв K ;

+V+Impers+Prs:вāннҍцлэтҍ K ; ! I don't know how to gloss "impersonal" [MR]

! Indicative past
+V+Prt+Sg1:вāннҍцлэ K ;
+V+Prt+Sg2:вāннҍцлэк K ;
+V+Prt+Sg3:вāннҍцэлт K ;
+V+Prt+Pl1:вāннҍцлэмь K ;
+V+Prt+Pl2:вāннҍцлэтҍ K ;
+V+Prt+Pl3:вāннҍцлэнҍ K ;

+V+Impers+Prt:вāннҍцлэнҍ K ;

! Imperative singular
+V+Imprt+Sg:вāннҍцэлт K ; ! formally similar to 3sg.pst

! Imperative plural
+V+Imprt+Sg:вāннҍцлэгкэ K ;

! Connegative non-past ! I don't know how to gloss "connegative" [MR]
+V+ConNeg+Prs:вāннҍцэлт K ; ! formally similar to 3sg.pst

! Connegative past
+V+ConNeg+Prt:вāннҍцла K ; ! formally similar to perfect perticiple, but note the alternative suffix ~/-a/ (not /-ma/)
